Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-115
Statement of business transacted; duties of county treasurer and county clerk.

The county treasurer and county clerk shall, when ordered by the county board, publish a detailed statement of the business transacted by them under the provisions of sections 10-101 to 10-125.

Laws 1875, § 10, p. 173;

R.S.1913, § 380;

C.S.1922, § 297;

C.S.1929, § 11-116;

R.S.1943, § 10-115.